Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Remedies, Procedure, Interest, and Penalties.

Cross references. —

For additional appeal procedures, see AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

.

Sec. 43.05.220.
Civil penalties.

Five percent shall be added to a tax for each 30-day period or fraction of the period during which the taxpayer fails to file at the time or times required by law or regulation a return or report, or pay the full amount of the tax, or a portion or a deficiency of the tax, as finally determined by the department and required by this title, unless it is shown that the failure is due to a reasonable cause and not to wilful neglect. The penalty may not exceed 25 percent in the aggregate. The penalty is computed only on the unpaid balance of the tax liability as determined by the department. The department shall prescribe by regulation circumstances which constitute reasonable cause for purposes of this section.

If a tax deficiency or part of a tax deficiency is due to negligence or intentional disregard of law or regulation without intent to defraud, five percent of the total amount of the tax deficiency shall be assessed, collected, and paid in the same manner as a tax deficiency.

If a tax deficiency or part of a tax deficiency is due to fraud, a civil fraud penalty equal to 50 percent of the tax due or $500, whichever is greater, shall be added to the tax. This penalty is in addition to penalties determined under (a) or (b) of this section.

A person required to collect or account for a tax imposed by this title who wilfully fails to collect the tax or to truthfully account for and pay over the tax, or wilfully attempts to evade payment of the tax is, in addition to other penalties provided by law, liable for a civil penalty equal to the total amount of the tax not collected, not accounted for, not paid over, or evaded. The penalty imposed by this subsection is in place of the tax not paid to the state. This penalty shall be paid upon demand by the commissioner or a designee of the commissioner, and shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as taxes are assessed and collected under this title.

A penalty imposed by this section shall be collected at the same time, in the same manner, and as a part of the original tax. However, if the original tax is paid before neglect or fraud is discovered, the penalty shall be collected in the same manner as the original tax. Interest may not be collected on a penalty imposed by this section.

Unless the department determines that failure to comply with AS

43.05.045

is due to a reasonable cause, the department shall assess a civil penalty of $25 or one percent of the total tax before any payment, whichever is greater, against a taxpayer who fails to submit electronically a return or report under AS

43.05.045

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

For fishery resource landing tax, see 15 AAC 77.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, added (f).

Sec. 43.05.225.
Interest.

Unless otherwise provided,

a delinquent tax under this title

before January 1, 2014, bears interest in each calendar quarter at the rate of five percentage points above the annual rate charged member banks for advances by the 12th Federal Reserve District as of the first day of that calendar quarter, or at the annual rate of 11 percent, whichever is greater, compounded quarterly as of the last day of that quarter;

on and after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2018, bears interest in each calendar quarter at the rate of three percentage points above the annual rate charged member banks for advances by the 12th Federal Reserve District as of the first day of that calendar quarter;

on and after January 1, 2018, bears interest in each calendar quarter at the rate of 5.25 percentage points above the annual rate charged member banks for advances by the 12th Federal Reserve District as of the first day of that calendar quarter, compounded quarterly as of the last day of that quarter;

the interest rate is 12 percent a year for

delinquent fees payable under AS

05.15.095(c)

; and

unclaimed property that is not timely paid or delivered, as allowed by AS

34.45.470(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 1991; am § 46 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 2013; am § 8 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am § 3 ch 3 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subparagraph (2)(B) was formerly (2)(C); relettered in 2012 to conform to the 1996 repeal of what was formerly (2)(B).

Cross references. —

For transition provision relating to the interest that a delinquent tax under AS 43.55 bears each calendar quarter of 2017, see sec. 36, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (1)(B), inserted “except as provided in (C) of this paragraph,” following “January 1, 2014”, added (1)(C), and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (1)(B), substituted “and before January 1, 2018” for “except as provided in (C) of this paragraph”; in (1)(C), substituted “January 1, 2018” for “January 1, 2017”, and in (1)(C)(i) deleted “For the first three years after a tax becomes delinquent” at the beginning, and substituted “5.25 percentage” for “seven percentage”, deleted (1)(C)(ii), which read, “after the first three years after a tax becomes delinquent, does not bear interest;”; made related and stylistic changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor’s transmittal letter concerning the amendment of this section by § 2, ch. 23, SLA 1991 (CSSB 158 (FIN)(efd am)), see 1991 Senate Journal, p. 405.

Sec. 43.05.230.
Disclosure of tax returns and reports.

It is unlawful for a current or former officer, employee, or agent of the state to divulge the amount of income or the particulars set out or disclosed in a report or return made under this title, except

in connection with official investigations or proceedings of the department, whether judicial or administrative, involving taxes due under this title;

in connection with official investigations or proceedings of the child support enforcement agency, whether judicial or administrative, involving child support obligations imposed or imposable under AS 25 or AS 47;

as provided in AS

38.05.036

pertaining to audit functions of the Department of Natural Resources;

as provided in AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

; and

as otherwise provided in this section or AS

43.55.890

.

The department, upon written request, shall furnish to the taxpayer a copy of the taxpayer’s tax return upon payment of a fee of $1 per page.

The department may permit the proper officer of the United States or of a state, territory or possession of the United States or of Canada or of a province or territory of Canada, or the officer’s authorized representative, to inspect tax returns or reports filed with the department, or may furnish to the officer or representative a copy of the tax return, if the other jurisdiction grants substantially similar privileges to the department or its representative or to counsel for the state, and if the department determines that the other jurisdiction provides adequate safeguards for the confidentiality of the returns and reports, and that the returns and reports will be used for tax purposes only. The department may also permit the division responsible for employment and training services of the state Department of Labor and Workforce Development to inspect tax returns or reports filed with the department or may furnish a copy of the tax returns for tax purposes only.

The commissioner may furnish to the Multistate Tax Commission or other authorized agent information contained in the tax returns, reports, related schedules and documents filed under an audit or investigation of a multistate business made by the department. This information may be furnished for tax purposes only. The Multistate Tax Commission or other authorized agent may make the information available to the tax officials of other states, the District of Columbia, and the United States and its territories for tax purposes only.

Nothing in this section prohibits the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports or the publication of delinquent lists showing the names of taxpayers who have failed to pay their taxes at the time and in the manner provided by law, together with other relevant information which in the opinion of the department may assist in the collection of delinquent taxes.

A wilful violation of the provisions of this section or of a condition imposed under AS

43.55.040

(1)(B) is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by imprisonment for not more than two years, or by both.

The information contained in a license issued by the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development under AS 43.40, AS 43.50, AS 43.60, AS 43.65, AS 43.70, and AS 43.75 is public information.

The commissioner shall, upon request, furnish to the Department of Natural Resources copies of tax returns, reports, and other documents filed under AS 43.55 or AS 43.65, and the Department of Revenue’s determinations and workpapers under those chapters. The Department of Natural Resources shall maintain the confidentiality that the Department of Revenue is required to extend to the returns, reports, documents, determinations, and workpapers furnished to the Department of Natural Resources under this subsection.

The commissioner shall, upon request, furnish to the Department of Environmental Conservation or the Department of Fish and Game all names and addresses of businesses that are required to file confidential reports under AS

43.75.015

. The Department of Environmental Conservation and the Department of Fish and Game shall maintain the confidentiality that the Department of Revenue is required to extend to the names and addresses furnished under this subsection.

The name of each person claiming a credit and the amount of credit received for each gas storage facility by that person under AS

43.20.046

is public information. The commissioner shall furnish the information to the Regulatory Commission of Alaska on request.

The name of each person that the department has allowed to make an election under AS

43.55.014(a)

and the amount of gas produced from each lease or property to which an effective election under AS

43.55.014

applies is public information.

For tax credit certificates purchased by the department in the preceding calendar year under AS

43.55.028

, the department shall make the following information public by April 30 of each year:

the name of each person from which the department purchased a transferable tax credit certificate; and

the aggregate amount of the tax credit certificates purchased from the person in the preceding calendar year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1976; am § 32 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 61 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 3 ch 113 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 68, § 3 (1988); am § 9 ch 101 SLA 1989; am § 9 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 92 SLA 2003; am § 63 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 12, 13 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 11 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 42 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2015; am E.O. No. 118, § 3 (2016); am § 9 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (g) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

In 2016, “division responsible for employment and training services” was substituted for “employment security division” in the last sentence of (c) to implement E.O. No. 118, Sec. 3.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, which added subsection (k), see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

For the governor's transmittal letter for Executive Order 118 which amended subsection (c), see 2016 Senate Journal 1581 — 1582.

Administrative Code. —

For mining production royalty, see 11 AAC 86, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, by E.O. 118, in (c), substituted “division responsible for employment and training services” for “employment security division”. E.O. No. 118, § 4, provides that the 2016 amendment to subsection (c) takes “effect July 1, 2016.” However, E.O. No. 118 was signed by the governor July 28, 2016.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (

l

).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matters, proposals to establish new rules affecting information sharing between the departments principally responsible for oil and gas production tax and royalty collection activities, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Division of audit to have access to records of state agencies, whether confidential or not. 1972 Op. Att’y Gen., issued under former AS

43.20.190

.

A legislative auditor may not examine confidential records on file for state income tax returns and wage information submitted by employees and employers to the Department of Labor in connection with the administration of the State Employment Security Act to determine if persons receiving assistance from the Department of Health and Social Services under their Adult Public Assistance and Aid to families with dependent children were eligible.
Such data is within the ambit of protection intended to be afforded the right of privacy under § 22, art. I, of the Alaska Constitution. 1972 Op. Att’y Gen., issued under former AS

43.20.190

.

When the taxpayer files the notice of appeal, a Department of Revenue hearing decision may be made public because the taxpayer is, in effect, waiving any right to confidentiality he may have had. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen., modifying March 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department can publish decisions that have not been appealed or for which confidentiality was not voluntarily waived if it establishes guidelines for publication to protect a taxpayer’s identity. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Publication of delinquent taxpayer lists under subsection (e) would not violate Ak. Const. art. I, § 22, which guarantees the right of privacy. August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Subsection (e), authorizing publication, does not conflict with subsection (a), which makes confidential the reports and returns filed under this title since subsection (e) simply exempts from the broader confidentiality provision the name of a delinquent taxpayer. August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

For discussion of liability for errors in names and amounts if a list is published under subsection (e), see August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department may choose to not publish the names of delinquent taxpayers owing less than a certain amount, so long as there is a rational basis for excluding certain names from publication. August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department may limit publication by publishing certain names in certain localities so long as there is a rational basis for doing so. August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Adoption of regulations setting forth the dates of publication and other pertinent information and providing notice regarding publication to the taxpayer at the time notice and demand is made, taken together, would provide adequate notice to each delinquent taxpayer, sufficient to satisfy due process requirements. August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department should be relatively immune from attack on due process and other grounds for publishing a list of delinquent taxpayers owing more than a certain amount if publication is not made until notice has been provided under AS

43.05.245

and the appeal period under AS

43.05.240

has run. August 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Revenue could disclose information obtained in the audit of Big Three Industries, Inc., to Big Three Lincoln Alaska, Inc., in the course of the hearing process on Big Three Lincoln’s administrative appeal of the determination that it was engaged in a unitary business with Big Three Industries. September 10, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute may not have access to a list of processors whose total value paid for seafood products during the previous calendar year exceeds $50,000, since the list can only be produced by extracting information from tax returns of seafood processors and since release of the list would divulge exactly which processors reported over $50,000 paid for seafood during the previous calendar year. September 9, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under limited circumstances, the Department of Revenue may disclose confidential tax records to members of the legislative branch under AS

09.25.100

(now AS

40.25.100

) and this section. January 12, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen., distinguishing 1972 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 8 and overruling January 17, 1986 Inf. Att’y Gen. Op. to the extent that it conflicts with this opinion.

Fisheries business license applications are required to be kept confidential and may not be released, even to such agencies as the National Marine Fisheries Service and the state Division of Fish & Wildlife Protection. July 26, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.05.240.
Taxpayer remedies.

A taxpayer aggrieved by the action of the department in fixing the amount of a tax or penalty may apply to the department within 60 days after the date of mailing of the notice required to be given to the taxpayer by the department, giving notice of the grievance, and requesting an informal conference to be scheduled with an appeals officer. The taxpayer shall be given access to the taxpayer’s file in the department in the matter for preparation for the informal conference. At the informal conference, the taxpayer may present to the appeals officer arguments and evidence relevant to the amount of tax or penalty due the state. If the department determines that a correction is warranted, the department shall make the correction.

A party who believes that the appeals officer is unduly delaying a hearing process may notify the commissioner in writing. Within 30 days after being notified by a party, the commissioner may issue an order prescribing a schedule for the appeals officer to complete the informal conference or setting a meeting at which that schedule will be discussed and prescribed. The schedule may be subsequently modified by consent of the parties. If the commissioner fails to issue an order within 30 days after receiving notice of a party’s belief of undue delay, the department’s action in fixing the amount of tax or penalty shall be considered to have been summarily affirmed by the appeals officer the same as if an informal conference decision to that effect were issued on the last day of that 30-day period.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For effect of the statute of limitations on assessments on consideration of new issues during taxpayer appeals, see notes to AS

43.05.260

. October 16, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The enforcement division can consolidate a tax enforcement action with taxpayer’s appeal to the superior court and proceed to judgment before the revenue decision is reviewed unless the taxpayer files a request for a stay and an accompanying supersedeas bond under Appellate Rule 603(a)(2) to prevent collection proceedings pending appeal. December 7, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department cannot use the AS

43.20.270

distraint on property procedures when a taxpayer has appealed an assessment under this section. December 7, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Whenever the department agrees to accept less than the full amount of tax or penalty that has been assessed (as distinguished from making a correction to an assessment in the course of an administrative appeal under this section), the department has compromised the tax or penalty within the meaning of AS

43.05.070

, and the attorney general’s approval is required. December 3, 1990, Op. Att’y Gen.

The term “administrative proceeding” in Alaska Const., art. IX, § 17 does not include the informal conference process established by this section for the resolution of tax disputes. The amendment applies only to the proceeds of disputes that have progressed to an adjudicatory stage of the dispute resolution process. 1992 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 43.05.241.
Administrative appeal.

For a matter within the jurisdiction of the office of administrative hearings (AS 44.64) under AS

43.05.405

, the taxpayer aggrieved by an informal conference decision entered under AS

43.05.240

may file with the office of administrative hearings a notice of appeal for formal hearing, as provided in AS

43.05.430

, no later than 30 days after service of the decision resulting from an informal conference.

History.

(§ 11 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 64 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 108, SLA 1996 provides as follows: “This Act does not affect the remedies and procedures

“(1) specified in AS 04.11, including AS

04.11.560

; AS 05.15, including AS

05.15.610

; AS 42.05, including AS

42.05.551

; or AS 43.56, including AS

43.56.120

and

43.56.130

; or

“(2) adopted by regulation by the Department of Revenue governing appeal of a decision of the Department of Revenue regarding

“(A) a game of chance or skill made under AS 05.15;

“(B) a permanent fund dividend under AS 43.23;

“(C) a coin-operated device or punchboard under AS 43.35; or

“(D) a child support obligation under AS 25.27.”

Section 18(a) and (c), ch. 108, SLA 1996 provide as follows: “(a) The remedies and procedures provided by this Act apply to all revenue tax appeals in which a request for formal hearing is filed with the Department of Revenue on or after the effective date of this subsection. The remedies and procedures existing before the effective date of this subsection apply to all revenue tax appeals in which a request for formal hearing was filed with the Department of Revenue before the effective date of this subsection, unless all of the parties to an appeal agree in writing to the remedies and procedures established by this Act.

“(c) Until 15 AAC 05.001 - 15 AAC 05.320 and other Department of Revenue regulations in effect on the effective date of this subsection are revised as necessary, those regulations continue to govern an administrative appeal of a Department of Revenue decision not within the jurisdiction of the office of tax appeals, including a decision regarding a

“(1) game of chance or skill under AS 05.15;

“(2) permanent fund dividend under AS 43.23; and

“(3) coin-operated device or punchboard under AS 43.35.”

Sec. 43.05.242.
Judicial appeal challenging validity of tax.

Within 30 days after a decision resulting from the informal conference, a person aggrieved by the action of the department under AS

43.05.240

on a ground specified in this section may appeal to the superior court.

An appeal under this section may be taken from an informal conference decision only with respect to an issue in the assessment for tax, interest, and penalties that the taxpayer raises upon the ground that a tax statute or tax regulation is

violative of the United States Constitution;

violative of the state constitution; or

preempted by federal statute, regulation, or treaty.

An appeal of an issue under this section may not be taken from an informal conference decision if

there is a dispute of material fact;

a factual record is necessary to decide the question of law raised;

development of a factual record will render it unnecessary to reach the question of law raised; or

the taxpayer challenges the assessment of the tax related to the issue on a ground other than one listed in (b) of this section.

An issue may not be presented to the superior court unless the issue first has been presented in writing to the department at or before the informal conference. The department shall prepare a record of that portion of the informal conference relevant to the issue on appeal. The superior court shall

resolve a question of law in the exercise of the independent judgment of the superior court judge;

defer to the department on a question of law for which discretion is legally vested in the department unless not supported by a reasonable basis.

An appeal of the informal conference decision under this section is exclusive as to the issue raised. The taxpayer electing to appeal under this section may not pursue an appeal of the issue under AS

43.05.241

or pursue any other action under another statute on the issue.

When an appeal is taken under this section, the taxpayer shall be given access to the file of the department in the matter for preparation of the appeal.

In an appeal under this section, the amount due shall be paid within 30 days after the date of the service of the informal conference decision. In place of payment of the amount due, the taxpayer may file a bond with the court or otherwise obtain relief from payment in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Venue for an appeal filed under this section shall be set under rules adopted by the supreme court.

If it is determined that appeal was improperly filed under this section, the appeal shall be transferred to the office of administrative hearings (AS 44.64) for further proceedings under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 65 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring an appeal to the superior court under this section to be heard on the record, see AS

22.10.020(d)

.

Sec. 43.05.245.
Assessment and collection of tax, penalties, and interest.

If a taxpayer fails to file a return or report required by this title in the time required by law or regulation, or makes an erroneous or fraudulent return, the department shall proceed to assess the license fees, tax, penalties, or interest and make a return from information that it obtains. An assessment or a return subscribed by the department in accordance with this section is presumed sufficient for all legal purposes. However, nothing prevents a taxpayer from presenting evidence or other information in an informal conference under AS

43.05.240

or in an appeal under AS

43.05.241

in order to rebut the presumed sufficiency of an assessment or return subscribed by the department, nor does the presumption of sufficiency alter the parties’ respective burdens of proof once the taxpayer has presented evidence or other material information to rebut that presumption. The assessment of license fees, tax, penalties, or interest under this section occurs when the department issues a notice and demand for payment of the license fees, tax, penalties, or interest. The notice and demand for payment is issued when the notice and demand is delivered to the taxpayer in person or placed in the United States mail, addressed to the last known address of the taxpayer. Penalties and interest assessed under this title shall be collected in the same manner as provided in this title for the collection of tax or license fees.

History.

(§ 4 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Sec. 43.05.250.
Payment of taxes.

If a tax is required under this title to be paid on or before a certain date, the date fixed is the last day for the payment.

In addition to money, the department may receive bank drafts, checks, cashier’s checks, or money orders for the payment of taxes under regulations adopted by the department.

The department may adopt other methods of payment including the use of bank depositories, bank and wire transfers, stamps, or other methods necessary or helpful in securing a complete and timely collection of the tax.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

For seafood marketing assessment on processors, see 15 AAC 116, art. 4.

Sec. 43.05.255.
Definition. [Repealed, E.O. No. 68 § 8 (1988).]

Sec. 43.05.260.
Limitation on assessment.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, AS

43.20.200(b)

, and AS

43.55.075

, the amount of a tax imposed by this title must be assessed within three years after the return was filed, whether or not a return was filed on or after the date prescribed by law. If the tax is not assessed before the expiration of the applicable period, proceedings may not be instituted in court for the collection of the tax.

For purposes of this section, a return filed before the last day prescribed by law or regulation is considered as filed on the last day.

The following exceptions apply to the limitation period in (a) of this section:

in the case of a false or fraudulent return with the intent to evade tax, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for collection of the tax may be begun without assessment, at any time;

in the case of a failure to file a return, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun without assessment, at any time;

if, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for the assessment of a tax imposed by this title, both the department and the taxpayer have consented in writing to the assessment after the expiration of the time, the tax may be assessed at any time before the expiration of the period agreed upon; however, the period agreed upon may be extended by a subsequent agreement in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1976; am § 113 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For opinion discussing tax assessments, see 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33 (income taxes).

The statute of limitations does not prohibit the hearing officer adjudicating a taxpayer appeal under AS

43.05.240

from considering evidence relating to new issues material to the tax on appeal in arriving at a decision concerning the correct amount of tax due the state. October 16, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

During administrative appeal proceedings the Division of Petroleum Revenue may introduce evidence concerning a different theory or method of valuation or new issues not addressed in the audit report and notice of assessment appealed by the taxpayer. October 16, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The statute of limitations on assessments does not prohibit the hearing officer from determining that the correct amount of tax due the state is more than that stated in the notice of assessment from which the taxpayer appealed. October 16, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the taxpayer pays the amount of tax in the notice of assessment, the Division of Petroleum Revenue may not reopen the matter and issue an amended assessment after the statute of limitations expires. However, if a notice of assessment is timely issued within the period of limitation under this section and the taxpayer appeals the assessment under AS

43.05.240

, the statute of limitations is suspended for the duration of administrative appeal proceedings. The notice of assessment can be amended after conference and hearing to reflect the decision with respect to the correct amount of tax due the state. October 16, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Oil and gas production taxes under
AS 43.55 are separate taxes imposed by different statutes for the purpose of applying the statute of limitations. If a taxpayer pays the assessed tax for oil and appeals only the assessment for gas, the Division of Petroleum Revenue may not issue an amended assessment for oil production taxes after the statute of limitations has run. October 16, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.05.270.
Collection after assessment.

When the assessment of a tax imposed by this title has been made within the period of limitation under AS

43.05.260

, the tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court, but only if the levy is made or the proceeding is begun

within six years after the assessment of the tax; or

before the expiration of a period for collection agreed upon in writing by the department and the taxpayer before the expiration of the six-year period; a period agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon; the period provided by this paragraph during which a tax may be collected by levy may not be extended or curtailed because of a judgment against the taxpayer.

The date on which a levy on property or right to property is made is the date on which the notice of seizure is given.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.05.275.
Credit and refund claims.

Except as provided in AS

43.20.021

, a claim for credit or refund of a tax under this title for which a taxpayer is required to file a return or pay a tax may be filed by the taxpayer

before the later of

three years from the time the return was filed; or

two years from the time the tax was paid; or

within two years from the time the tax was paid, if no return was filed.

If the department and the taxpayer have consented to extend the period for assessment of tax as provided in AS

43.05.260(c)(3)

, a tax refund claim may be filed at any time before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

A taxpayer who has filed a return, paid the full amount due on the return, and made a claim under this section may, without exhausting administrative remedies, file an action in superior court to recover on the claim if the sole ground for appeal is that a tax statute is

violative of the United States Constitution;

violative of the state constitution; or

preempted by federal statute, regulation, or treaty.

An action may not be brought under (c) of this section if

there is a dispute of material fact;

a factual record is necessary to decide the appeal;

development of a factual record will render it unnecessary to reach a question of constitutional law or federal preemption; or

the taxpayer challenges the assessment of the tax on a ground other than one listed in (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.05.280.
Interest on overpayments.

Interest shall be allowed and paid on an overpayment of a tax under this title at the rate and in the manner provided in AS

43.05.225

(1).

Interest shall be allowed and paid as follows:

in the case of a credit, from the date of the overpayment to the due date of the amount against which the credit is taken;

in the case of a refund, from the date of the overpayment to a date, as determined by the department, preceding the date of the refund check by not more than 30 days, whether or not the refund check is accepted by the taxpayer after tender of the check to the taxpayer; the acceptance of the refund check does not affect the right of the taxpayer to claim an additional overpayment and interest on the overpayment.

If an overpayment of a tax imposed by this title is refunded within 90 days after the last date prescribed for filing the return of the tax, determined without regard to an extension of time for filing the return, or if the return is filed after the last filing date and the overpayment is refunded within 90 days after the date the return is filed, interest may not be allowed under (a) of this section on that overpayment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 23 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.